Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-197
Violations; peace
officer; duties; neglect of duty; penalty.

(1) Every sheriff, deputy
sheriff, police officer, marshal, or deputy marshal who knows or who is credibly
informed that any offense has been committed against any law of this state relating
to the sale of alcoholic liquor shall make complaint
against the person so offending within their respective jurisdictions to the
proper court, and for every neglect or refusal so to do, every such officer
shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

(2) Every sheriff,
deputy sheriff, police officer, marshal, or deputy marshal who knows or who
is credibly informed that any offense has been committed against any law of
this state relating to the sale of alcoholic liquor shall report such offense
in writing to the executive director of the commission (a) within thirty days
after such offense is committed, (b) within thirty days after such sheriff,
deputy sheriff, police officer, marshal, or deputy marshal is informed of
such offense, (c) within thirty days after the conclusion of an ongoing police
investigation, or (d) within thirty days after the verdict in a prosecution
related to such an ongoing police investigation if the prosecuting attorney
determines that reporting such violation prior to the verdict would jeopardize
such prosecution, whichever is later.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 75, p. 412;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-375;

R.S.1943, § 53-197;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 257;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 318;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 44;

Laws 2011, LB641, § 2.